Ohio, session 136, HB450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 4503.44 and 4511.69 of the 5
Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 4503.44. (A) As used in this section and in section 7
4511.69 of the Revised Code: 8
(1) "Person with a disability that limits or impairs the 9
ability to walk" means any person who, as determined by a health 10
care provider, meets any of the following criteria: 11
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest; 12
(b) Cannot walk without the use of, or assistance from, a 13
brace, cane, crutch, another person, prosthetic device, 14
wheelchair, or other assistive device; 15
(c) Is restricted by a lung disease to such an extent that 16
the person's forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for one 17
second, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter, or 18
the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty millimeters of 19

H. B. No. 450 Page 2
As Introduced
mercury on room air at rest; 20
(d) Uses portable oxygen; 21
(e) Has a cardiac condition to the extent that the 22
person's functional limitations are classified in severity as 23
class III or class IV according to standards set by the American 24
heart association; 25
(f) Is severely limited in the ability to walk due to an 26
arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition; 27
(g) Is blind, legally blind, or severely visually 28
impaired. 29
(2) "Organization" means any private organization or 30
corporation, or any governmental board, agency, department, 31
division, or office, that, as part of its business or program, 32
transports persons with disabilities that limit or impair the 33
ability to walk on a regular basis in a motor vehicle that has 34
not been altered for the purpose of providing it with accessible 35
equipment for use by persons with disabilities. This definition 36
does not apply to division (I) of this section. 37
(3) "Health care provider" means a physician, physician 38
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist, or 39
chiropractor as defined in this section except that an 40
optometrist shall only make determinations as to division (A)(1) 41
(g) of this section. 42
(4) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice 43
medicine or surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery under 44
Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code. 45
(5) "Chiropractor" means a person licensed to practice 46
chiropractic under Chapter 4734. of the Revised Code. 47

H. B. No. 450 Page 3
As Introduced
(6) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means a certified 48
nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, certified 49
registered nurse anesthetist, or certified nurse-midwife who 50
holds a certificate of authority issued by the board of nursing 51
under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. 52
(7) "Physician assistant" means a person who is licensed 53
as a physician assistant under Chapter 4730. of the Revised 54
Code. 55
(8) "Optometrist" means a person licensed to engage in the 56
practice of optometry under Chapter 4725. of the Revised Code. 57
(9) "Pregnant," "pregnancy," and "unborn child" have the 58
same meanings as in section 2919.16 of the Revised Code. 59
(10) "Removable windshield placard" includes a standard 60
removable windshield placard, a temporary removable windshield 61
placard, a pregnancy removable windshield placard, or a 62
permanent removable windshield placard, unless otherwise 63
specified. 64
(B)(1) An organization, or a person with a disability that 65
limits or impairs the ability to walk, may apply for the 66
registration of any motor vehicle the organization or person 67
owns or leases. When an adaptive mobility vehicle is owned or 68
leased by someone other than a person with a disability that 69
limits or impairs the ability to walk, the owner or lessee may 70
apply to the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar 71
for registration under this section. The application for 72
registration of a motor vehicle owned or leased by a person with 73
a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk shall be 74
accompanied by a signed statement from the applicant's health 75
care provider certifying that the applicant meets at least one 76

H. B. No. 450 Page 4
As Introduced
of the criteria contained in division (A)(1) of this section and 77
that the disability is expected to continue for more than six 78
consecutive months. The application for registration of an 79
adaptive mobility vehicle that is owned by someone other than a 80
person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to 81
walk shall be accompanied by such documentary evidence of 82
vehicle specifications or alterations as the registrar may 83
require by rule. 84
(2) When an organization, a person with a disability that 85
limits or impairs the ability to walk, or a person who does not 86
have a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk but 87
owns a motor vehicle that has been altered for the purpose of 88
providing it with accessible equipment for a person with a 89
disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk first 90
submits an application for registration of a motor vehicle under 91
this section and every fifth year thereafter, the organization 92
or person shall submit a signed statement from the applicant's 93
health care provider, a completed application, and any required 94
documentary evidence of vehicle specifications or alterations as 95
provided in division (B)(1) of this section, and also a power of 96
attorney from the owner of the motor vehicle if the applicant 97
leases the vehicle. Upon submission of these items, the 98
registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant 99
appropriate vehicle registration and a set of license plates and 100
validation stickers, or validation stickers alone when required 101
by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. In addition to the 102
letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed thereon, the license 103
plates shall be imprinted with the international symbol of 104
access. The license plates and validation stickers shall be 105
issued upon payment of the regular license fee as prescribed 106
under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code and any motor vehicle 107

H. B. No. 450 Page 5
As Introduced
tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, and the 108
payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under 109
section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. 110
(C)(1) A person with a disability that limits or impairs 111
the ability to walk or a pregnant woman may apply to the 112
registrar for a removable windshield placard by completing and 113
signing an application provided by the registrar. 114
(2) The person shall include with the application a 115
prescription from the person's health care provider prescribing 116
such a placard for the person based upon a determination that 117
the person meets at least one of the criteria contained in 118
division (A)(1) of this section or is pregnant. The health care 119
provider shall state on the prescription the length of time the 120
health care provider expects the applicant to have the 121
disability that limits or impairs the person's ability to walk 122
or the due date of the unborn child, as applicable. If the 123
length of time the applicant is expected to have the disability 124
is six consecutive months or less, the applicant shall submit an 125
application for a temporary removable windshield placard. If the 126
applicant is pregnant and does not otherwise have a separate 127
disability that limits or impairs the applicant's ability to 128
walk, the applicant shall submit an application for a pregnancy 129
removable windshield placard. If the length of time the 130
applicant is expected to have the disability is permanent, the 131
applicant shall submit an application for a permanent removable 132
windshield placard. All other applicants shall submit an 133
application for a standard removable windshield placard. 134
(3) In addition to one placard or one or more sets of 135
license plates, a person with a disability that limits or 136
impairs the ability to walk or pregnant woman is entitled to one 137

H. B. No. 450 Page 6
As Introduced
additional placard, but only if the person applies separately 138
for the additional placard, states the reasons why the 139
additional placard is needed, and the registrar, in the 140
registrar's discretion determines that good and justifiable 141
cause exists to approve the request for the additional placard. 142
(4) An organization may apply to the registrar of motor 143
vehicles for a standard removable windshield placard by 144
completing and signing an application provided by the registrar. 145
The organization shall comply with any procedures the registrar 146
establishes by rule. The organization shall include with the 147
application documentary evidence that the registrar requires by 148
rule showing that the organization regularly transports persons 149
with disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk. 150
(5) The registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to an 151
applicant a standard removable windshield placard, a temporary 152
removable windshield placard, a pregnancy removable windshield 153
placard, or a permanent removable windshield placard, as 154
applicable, upon receipt of all of the following: 155
(a) A completed and signed application for a removable 156
windshield placard; 157
(b) The accompanying documents required under division (C) 158
(2) or (4) of this section; 159
(c) Payment of a service fee equal to the amount 160
established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for a 161
standard removable windshield placard, a pregnancy removable 162
windshield placard, or a temporary removable windshield placard, 163
or payment of fifteen dollars for a permanent removable 164
windshield placard. 165
(6) The removable windshield placard shall display the 166

H. B. No. 450 Page 7
As Introduced
date of expiration on both sides of the placard, or the word 167
"permanent" if the placard is a permanent removable windshield 168
placard, and shall be valid until expired, revoked, or 169
surrendered. Except for a permanent removable windshield 170
placard, which has no expiration, or a pregnancy removable 171
windshield placard, which expires after one year, a removable 172
windshield placard expires on the earliest of the following two 173
dates: 174
(a) The date that the person issued the placard is 175
expected to no longer have the disability that limits or impairs 176
the ability to walk, as indicated on the prescription submitted 177
with the application for the placard; 178
(b) Ten years after the date of issuance on the placard. 179
In no case shall a removable windshield placard be valid 180
for a period of less than sixty days. 181
(7) Standard removable windshield placards shall be 182
renewable upon application and upon payment of a service fee 183
equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the 184
Revised Code. The registrar shall provide the application form 185
and shall determine the information to be included thereon. 186
(8) The registrar shall determine the form and size of 187
each type of the removable windshield placard, the material of 188
which it is to be made, any differences in color between each 189
type of placard to make them readily identifiable, and any other 190
information to be included thereon, and shall adopt rules 191
relating to the issuance, expiration, revocation, surrender, and 192
proper display of such placards. A temporary removable 193
windshield placard shall display the word "temporary" in letters 194
of such size as the registrar shall prescribe. Any placard 195

H. B. No. 450 Page 8
As Introduced
issued after October 14, 1999, shall be manufactured in a manner 196
that allows the expiration date of the placard to be indicated 197
on it through the punching, drilling, boring, or creation by any 198
other means of holes in the placard. 199
(9)(9)(a) At the time a removable windshield placard is 200
issued to a person with a disability that limits or impairs the 201
ability to walk, the registrar or deputy registrar shall enter 202
into the records of the bureau of motor vehicles the last date 203
on which the person will have that disability, as indicated on 204
the accompanying prescription. For a standard removable 205
windshield placard, not less than thirty days prior to that date 206
and any renewal dates, the bureau shall send a renewal notice to 207
that person at the person's last known address as shown in the 208
records of the bureau, informing the person that the person's 209
removable windshield placard will expire on the indicated date, 210
and that the person is required to renew the placard by 211
submitting to the registrar or a deputy registrar another 212
prescription, and by complying with the renewal provisions. If 213
such a prescription is not received by the registrar or a deputy 214
registrar by that date, the placard issued to that person 215
expires and no longer is valid, and this fact shall be recorded 216
in the records of the bureau. 217
(b) At the time a pregnancy removable windshield placard 218
is issued to a pregnant woman, the registrar or deputy registrar 219
shall enter into the records of the bureau an expiration date 220
that is one year after the date of issuance of the placard. A 221
pregnancy removable windshield placard is not renewable, but a 222
new placard may be issued in accordance with division (C) of 223
this section for a subsequent pregnancy. 224
(10) At least once every year, on a date determined by the 225

H. B. No. 450 Page 9
As Introduced
registrar, the bureau shall examine the records of the office of 226
vital statistics, located within the department of health, that 227
pertain to deceased persons, and also the bureau's records of 228
all persons who have been issued removable windshield placards. 229
If the records of the office of vital statistics indicate that a 230
person to whom a removable windshield placard has been issued is 231
deceased, the bureau shall cancel that placard, and note the 232
cancellation in its records. 233
The office of vital statistics shall make available to the 234
bureau all information necessary to enable the bureau to comply 235
with division (C)(10) of this section. 236
(11) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require 237
a person or organization to apply for a removable windshield 238
placard or accessible license plates if the accessible license 239
plates issued to the person or organization under prior law have 240
not expired or been surrendered or revoked. 241
(D) Any active-duty member of the armed forces of the 242
United States, including the reserve components of the armed 243
forces and the national guard, who has an illness or injury that 244
limits or impairs the ability to walk may apply to the registrar 245
or a deputy registrar for a temporary removable windshield 246
placard. With the application, the person shall present evidence 247
of the person's active-duty status and the illness or injury. 248
Evidence of the illness or injury may include a current 249
department of defense convalescent leave statement, any 250
department of defense document indicating that the person 251
currently has an ill or injured casualty status or has limited 252
duties, or a prescription from any health care provider 253
prescribing the placard for the applicant. Upon receipt of the 254
application and the necessary evidence, the registrar or deputy 255

H. B. No. 450 Page 10
As Introduced
registrar shall issue the applicant the temporary removable 256
windshield placard without the payment of any service fee. 257
(E) If an applicant for a removable windshield placard is 258
a veteran of the armed forces of the United States whose 259
disability, as defined in division (A)(1) of this section, is 260
service-connected, the registrar or deputy registrar, upon 261
receipt of the application, presentation of a signed statement 262
from the applicant's health care provider certifying the 263
applicant's disability, and presentation of such documentary 264
evidence from the department of veterans affairs that the 265
disability of the applicant meets at least one of the criteria 266
identified in division (A)(1) of this section and is service- 267
connected as the registrar may require by rule, but without the 268
payment of any service fee, shall issue the applicant a 269
removable windshield placard that is valid until expired, 270
surrendered, or revoked. 271
(F)(1) Upon a conviction of a violation of division (H) or 272
(I) of this section, the court shall report the conviction, and 273
send the placard, if available, to the registrar, who thereupon 274
shall revoke the privilege of using the placard and send notice 275
in writing to the placardholder at that holder's last known 276
address as shown in the records of the bureau, and the 277
placardholder shall return the placard if not previously 278
surrendered to the court, to the registrar within ten days 279
following mailing of the notice. 280
(2) Whenever a person to whom a removable windshield 281
placard has been issued moves to another state, the person shall 282
surrender the placard to the registrar; and whenever an 283
organization to which a placard has been issued changes its 284
place of operation to another state, the organization shall 285

H. B. No. 450 Page 11
As Introduced
surrender the placard to the registrar. 286
(3) If a person no longer requires a permanent removable 287
windshield placard, the person shall notify and surrender the 288
placard to the registrar or deputy registrar within ten days of 289
no longer requiring the placard. The person may still apply for 290
a standard removable windshield placard, pregnancy removable 291
windshield placard, or temporary removable windshield placard, 292
if applicable. 293
(G) Subject to division (F) of section 4511.69 of the 294
Revised Code, the operator of a motor vehicle displaying a 295
removable windshield placard or the accessible license plates 296
authorized by this section is entitled to park the motor vehicle 297
in any accessible parking location reserved for persons with 298
disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk. 299
(H) No person or organization that is not eligible for the 300
issuance of license plates or any placard under this section 301
shall willfully and falsely represent that the person or 302
organization is so eligible. 303
No person or organization shall display license plates 304
issued under this section unless the license plates have been 305
issued for the vehicle on which they are displayed and are 306
valid. 307
(I) No person or organization to which a removable 308
windshield placard is issued shall do either of the following: 309
(1) Display or permit the display of the placard on any 310
motor vehicle when having reasonable cause to believe the motor 311
vehicle is being used in connection with an activity that does 312
not include providing transportation for persons with 313
disabilities that limit or impair the ability to walk, a 314

H. B. No. 450 Page 12
As Introduced
pregnant woman, or a postpartum woman prior to the expiration 315
date of the placard; 316
(2) Refuse to return or surrender the placard, when 317
required. 318
(J) If a removable windshield placard or parking card is 319
lost, destroyed, or mutilated, the placardholder or cardholder 320
may obtain a duplicate by doing both of the following: 321
(1) Furnishing suitable proof of the loss, destruction, or 322
mutilation to the registrar; 323
(2) Paying a service fee equal to the amount paid when the 324
placardholder obtained the original placard. 325
Any placardholder who loses a placard and, after obtaining 326
a duplicate, finds the original, immediately shall surrender the 327
original placard to the registrar. 328
(K)(1) The registrar shall pay all fees received under 329
this section for the issuance of removable windshield placards 330
or duplicate removable windshield placards into the state 331
treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes 332
fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 333
(2) In addition to the fees collected under this section, 334
the registrar or deputy registrar shall ask each person applying 335
for a removable windshield placard or duplicate removable 336
windshield placard or license plate issued under this section, 337
whether the person wishes to make a two-dollar voluntary 338
contribution to support rehabilitation employment services. The 339
registrar shall transmit the contributions received under this 340
division to the treasurer of state for deposit into the 341
rehabilitation employment fund, which is hereby created in the 342
state treasury. A deputy registrar shall transmit the 343

H. B. No. 450 Page 13
As Introduced
contributions received under this division to the registrar in 344
the time and manner prescribed by the registrar. The 345
contributions in the fund shall be used by the opportunities for 346
Ohioans with disabilities agency to purchase services related to 347
vocational evaluation, work adjustment, personal adjustment, job 348
placement, job coaching, and community-based assessment from 349
accredited community rehabilitation program facilities. 350
(L) For purposes of enforcing this section, every peace 351
officer is deemed to be an agent of the registrar. Any peace 352
officer or any authorized employee of the bureau of motor 353
vehicles who, in the performance of duties authorized by law, 354
becomes aware of a person whose removable windshield placard or 355
parking card has been revoked pursuant to this section, may 356
confiscate that placard or parking card and return it to the 357
registrar. The registrar shall prescribe any forms used by law 358
enforcement agencies in administering this section. 359
No peace officer, law enforcement agency employing a peace 360
officer, or political subdivision or governmental agency 361
employing a peace officer, and no employee of the bureau is 362
liable in a civil action for damages or loss to persons arising 363
out of the performance of any duty required or authorized by 364
this section. As used in this division, "peace officer" has the 365
same meaning as in division (B) of section 2935.01 of the 366
Revised Code. 367
(M) All applications for registration of motor vehicles 368
and removable windshield placards issued under this section, all 369
renewal notices for such items, and all other publications 370
issued by the bureau that relate to this section shall set forth 371
the criminal penalties that may be imposed upon a person who 372
violates any provision relating to accessible license plates 373

H. B. No. 450 Page 14
As Introduced
issued under this section, the parking of vehicles displaying 374
such license plates, and the issuance, procurement, use, and 375
display of removable windshield placards issued under this 376
section. 377
(N) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a 378
misdemeanor of the fourth degree. 379
Sec. 4511.69. (A) Every vehicle stopped or parked upon a 380
roadway where there is an adjacent curb shall be stopped or 381
parked with the right-hand wheels of the vehicle parallel with 382
and not more than twelve inches from the right-hand curb, unless 383
it is impossible to approach so close to the curb; in such case 384
the stop shall be made as close to the curb as possible and only 385
for the time necessary to discharge and receive passengers or to 386
load or unload merchandise. Local authorities by ordinance may 387
permit angle parking on any roadway under their jurisdiction, 388
except that angle parking shall not be permitted on a state 389
route within a municipal corporation unless an unoccupied 390
roadway width of not less than twenty-five feet is available for 391
free-moving traffic. 392
(B) Local authorities by ordinance may permit parking of 393
vehicles with the left-hand wheels adjacent to and within twelve 394
inches of the left-hand curb of a one-way roadway. 395
(C)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(1)(b) of this 396
section, no vehicle or trackless trolley shall be stopped or 397
parked on a road or highway with the vehicle or trackless 398
trolley facing in a direction other than the direction of travel 399
on that side of the road or highway. 400
(b) The operator of a motorcycle may back the motorcycle 401
into an angled parking space so that when the motorcycle is 402

H. B. No. 450 Page 15
As Introduced
parked it is facing in a direction other than the direction of 403
travel on the side of the road or highway. 404
(2) The operator of a motorcycle may back the motorcycle 405
into a parking space that is located on the side of, and 406
parallel to, a road or highway. The motorcycle may face any 407
direction when so parked. Not more than two motorcycles at a 408
time shall be parked in a parking space as described in division 409
(C)(2) of this section irrespective of whether or not the space 410
is metered. 411
(D) Notwithstanding any statute or any rule, resolution, 412
or ordinance adopted by any local authority, air compressors, 413
tractors, trucks, and other equipment, while being used in the 414
construction, reconstruction, installation, repair, or removal 415
of facilities near, on, over, or under a street or highway, may 416
stop, stand, or park where necessary in order to perform such 417
work, provided a flagperson is on duty or warning signs or 418
lights are displayed as may be prescribed by the director of 419
transportation. 420
(E) Accessible parking locations and privileges that are 421
available for persons with disabilities that limit or impair the 422
ability to walk and pregnant women shall be provided and 423
designated by all political subdivisions and by the state and 424
all agencies and instrumentalities thereof at all offices and 425
facilities, where parking is provided, whether owned, rented, or 426
leased, and at all publicly owned parking garages. The locations 427
shall be designated through the posting of an elevated sign, 428
whether permanently affixed or movable, imprinted with the 429
international symbol of access and shall be reasonably close to 430
exits, entrances, elevators, and ramps. All elevated signs 431
posted in accordance with this division and division (C) of 432

H. B. No. 450 Page 16
As Introduced
section 3781.111 of the Revised Code shall be mounted on a fixed 433
or movable post, and the distance from the ground to the bottom 434
edge of the sign shall measure not less than five feet. If a new 435
sign or a replacement sign designating an accessible parking 436
location is posted on or after October 14, 1999, there also 437
shall be affixed upon the surface of that sign or affixed next 438
to the designating sign a notice that states the fine applicable 439
for the offense of parking a motor vehicle in the designated 440
accessible parking location if the motor vehicle is not legally 441
entitled to be parked in that location. 442
(F)(1)(a) No person shall stop, stand, or park any motor 443
vehicle at accessible parking locations provided under division 444
(E) of this section or at accessible clearly marked parking 445
locations provided in or on privately owned parking lots, 446
parking garages, or other parking areas and designated in 447
accordance with that division, unless one of the following 448
applies: 449
(i) The motor vehicle is being operated by or for the 450
transport of a person with a disability that limits or impairs 451
the ability to walk and is displaying a valid removable 452
windshield placard or accessible license plates; 453
(ii) The motor vehicle is being operated by or for the 454
transport of a person with a disability and is displaying a 455
parking card or accessible license plates; 456
(iii) The motor vehicle is being operated by or for the 457
transport of a pregnant woman or a postpartum woman and is 458
displaying a valid pregnancy removable windshield placard. 459
(b) Any motor vehicle that is parked in an accessible 460
marked parking location in violation of division (F)(1)(a)(i) or 461

H. B. No. 450 Page 17
As Introduced
(ii) of this section may be towed or otherwise removed from the 462
parking location by the law enforcement agency of the political 463
subdivision in which the parking location is located. A motor 464
vehicle that is so towed or removed shall not be released to its 465
owner until the owner presents proof of ownership of the motor 466
vehicle and pays all towing and storage fees normally imposed by 467
that political subdivision for towing and storing motor 468
vehicles. If the motor vehicle is a leased vehicle, it shall not 469
be released to the lessee until the lessee presents proof that 470
that person is the lessee of the motor vehicle and pays all 471
towing and storage fees normally imposed by that political 472
subdivision for towing and storing motor vehicles. 473
(c) If a person is charged with a violation of division 474
(F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section, it is an affirmative 475
defense to the charge that the person suffered an injury not 476
more than seventy-two hours prior to the time the person was 477
issued the ticket or citation and that, because of the injury, 478
the person meets at least one of the criteria contained in 479
division (A)(1) of section 4503.44 of the Revised Code. 480
(2) No person shall stop, stand, or park any motor vehicle 481
in an area that is commonly known as an access aisle, which area 482
is marked by diagonal stripes and is located immediately 483
adjacent to an accessible parking location provided under 484
division (E) of this section or at an accessible clearly marked 485
parking location provided in or on a privately owned parking 486
lot, parking garage, or other parking area and designated in 487
accordance with that division. 488
(G) When a motor vehicle is being operated by or for the 489
transport of a person with a disability that limits or impairs 490
the ability to walk and is displaying a removable windshield 491

H. B. No. 450 Page 18
As Introduced
placard or accessible license plates, or when a motor vehicle is 492
being operated by or for the transport of a person with a 493
disability and is displaying a parking card or accessible 494
license plates, the motor vehicle is permitted to park for a 495
period of two hours in excess of the legal parking period 496
permitted by local authorities, except where local ordinances or 497
police rules provide otherwise or where the vehicle is parked in 498
such a manner as to be clearly a traffic hazard. 499
(H) No owner of an office, facility, or parking garage 500
where accessible parking locations are required to be designated 501
in accordance with division (E) of this section shall fail to 502
properly mark the accessible parking locations in accordance 503
with that division or fail to maintain the markings of the 504
accessible locations, including the erection and maintenance of 505
the fixed or movable signs. 506
(I) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require 507
a person or organization to apply for a removable windshield 508
placard or accessible license plates if the parking card or 509
accessible license plates issued to the person or organization 510
under prior law have not expired or been surrendered or revoked. 511
(J)(1) Whoever violates division (A) or (C) of this 512
section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. 513
(2)(a) Whoever violates division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of 514
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as 515
provided in division (J)(2)(a) and (b) of this section. Except 516
as otherwise provided in division (J)(2)(a) of this section, an 517
offender who violates division (F)(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this 518
section shall be fined not less than two hundred fifty nor more 519
than five hundred dollars. An offender who violates division (F) 520
(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section shall be fined not more than 521

H. B. No. 450 Page 19
As Introduced
one hundred dollars if the offender, prior to sentencing, proves 522
either of the following to the satisfaction of the court: 523
(i) At the time of the violation of division (F)(1)(a)(i) 524
of this section, the offender or the person for whose transport 525
the motor vehicle was being operated had been issued a removable 526
windshield placard that then was valid or accessible license 527
plates that then were valid but the offender or the person 528
neglected to display the placard or license plates as described 529
in division (F)(1)(a)(i) of this section. 530
(ii) At the time of the violation of division (F)(1)(a) 531
(ii) of this section, the offender or the person for whose 532
transport the motor vehicle was being operated had been issued a 533
parking card that then was valid or accessible license plates 534
that then were valid but the offender or the person neglected to 535
display the card or license plates as described in division (F) 536
(1)(a)(ii) of this section. 537
(b) In no case shall an offender who violates division (F) 538
(1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section be sentenced to any term of 539
imprisonment. 540
An arrest or conviction for a violation of division (F)(1) 541
(a)(i) or (ii) of this section does not constitute a criminal 542
record and need not be reported by the person so arrested or 543
convicted in response to any inquiries contained in any 544
application for employment, license, or other right or 545
privilege, or made in connection with the person's appearance as 546
a witness. 547
The clerk of the court shall pay every fine collected 548
under divisions (J)(2) and (3) of this section to the political 549
subdivision in which the violation occurred. Except as provided 550

H. B. No. 450 Page 20
As Introduced
in division (J)(2) of this section, the political subdivision 551
shall use the fine moneys it receives under divisions (J)(2) and 552
(3) of this section to pay the expenses it incurs in complying 553
with the signage and notice requirements contained in division 554
(E) of this section. The political subdivision may use up to 555
fifty per cent of each fine it receives under divisions (J)(2) 556
and (3) of this section to pay the costs of educational, 557
advocacy, support, and assistive technology programs for persons 558
with disabilities, and for public improvements within the 559
political subdivision that benefit or assist persons with 560
disabilities, if governmental agencies or nonprofit 561
organizations offer the programs. 562
(3) Whoever violates division (F)(2) of this section shall 563
be fined not less than two hundred fifty nor more than five 564
hundred dollars. 565
In no case shall an offender who violates division (F)(2) 566
of this section be sentenced to any term of imprisonment. An 567
arrest or conviction for a violation of division (F)(2) of this 568
section does not constitute a criminal record and need not be 569
reported by the person so arrested or convicted in response to 570
any inquiries contained in any application for employment, 571
license, or other right or privilege, or made in connection with 572
the person's appearance as a witness. 573
(4) Whoever violates division (H) of this section shall be 574
punished as follows: 575
(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(4) of 576
this section, the offender shall be issued a warning. 577
(b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or 578
pleaded guilty to a violation of division (H) of this section or 579

H. B. No. 450 Page 21
As Introduced
of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that 580
division, the offender shall not be issued a warning but shall 581
be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each parking 582
location that is not properly marked or whose markings are not 583
properly maintained. 584
(K) As used in this section: 585
(1) "Person with a disability" means any person who has 586
lost the use of one or both legs or one or both arms, who is 587
blind, deaf, or unable to move without the aid of crutches or a 588
wheelchair, or whose mobility is restricted by a permanent 589
cardiovascular, pulmonary, or other disabling condition. 590
(2) "Person with a disability that limits or impairs the 591
ability to walk" has the same meaning as in section 4503.44 of 592
the Revised Code. 593
(3) "Accessible license plates" and "removable windshield 594
placard" mean any license plates, standard removable windshield 595
placard, permanent removable windshield placard, pregnancy 596
removable windshield placard, or temporary removable windshield 597
placard issued under section 4503.41 or 4503.44 of the Revised 598
Code, and also mean any substantially similar license plates or 599
removable windshield placard issued by a state, district, 600
country, or sovereignty. 601
Section 2. That existing sections 4503.44 and 4511.69 of 602
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 603
Section 3. Section 4503.44 of the Revised Code is 604
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 605
by both H.B. 33 and H.B. 195 of the 135th General Assembly. The 606
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 607
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 608

H. B. No. 450 Page 22
As Introduced
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 609
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 610
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 611
presented in this act. 612